Illinois, session 104th, HB3291.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 2-3 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/2-3)  (from Ch. 37, par. 802-3)7    Sec. 2-3. Neglected or abused minor. 8    (1) Those who are neglected include any minor under 18 9years of age or a minor 18 years of age or older for whom the 10court has made a finding of probable cause to believe that the 11minor is abused, neglected, or dependent under subsection (1) 12of Section 2-10 prior to the minor's 18th birthday:13        (a) who is not receiving the proper or necessary 14    support, education as required by law, or medical or other 15    remedial care recognized under State law as necessary for 16    a minor's well-being, or other care necessary for the 17    minor's well-being, including adequate food, clothing, and 18    shelter, or who is abandoned by the minor's parent or 19    parents or other person or persons responsible for the 20    minor's welfare, except that a minor shall not be 21    considered neglected for the sole reason that the minor's 22    parent or parents or other person or persons responsible 23    for the minor's welfare have left the minor in the care of   HB3291- 2 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1    an adult relative for any period of time, who the parent or 2    parents or other person responsible for the minor's 3    welfare know is both a mentally capable adult relative and 4    physically capable adult relative, as defined by this Act; 5    or6        (b) whose environment is injurious to the minor's 7    welfare; or8        (c) who is a newborn infant whose blood, urine, or 9    meconium contains any amount of a controlled substance as 10    defined in subsection (f) of Section 102 of the Illinois 11    Controlled Substances Act or a metabolite of a controlled 12    substance, with the exception of controlled substances or 13    metabolites of such substances, the presence of which in 14    the newborn infant is the result of medical treatment 15    administered to the person who gave birth or the newborn 16    infant; or17        (d) whose parent or other person responsible for the 18    minor's welfare leaves the minor without supervision for 19    an unreasonable period of time without regard for the 20    mental or physical health, safety, or welfare of that 21    minor. Whether the minor was left without regard for the 22    mental or physical health, safety, or welfare of that 23    minor or the period of time was unreasonable shall be 24    determined by considering factors including, but not 25    limited to, the following:26            (1) the age of the minor;  HB3291- 3 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1            (2) the number of minors left at the location;2            (3) the special needs of the minor, including 3        whether the minor is a person with a physical or mental 4        disability or is otherwise in need of ongoing 5        prescribed medical treatment, such as periodic doses 6        of insulin or other medications; 7            (4) the duration of time in which the minor was 8        left without supervision;9            (5) the condition and location of the place where 10        the minor was left without supervision; 11            (6) the time of day or night when the minor was 12        left without supervision; 13            (7) the weather conditions, including whether the 14        minor was left in a location with adequate protection 15        from the natural elements, such as adequate heat or 16        light; 17            (8) the location of the parent or guardian at the 18        time the minor was left without supervision and the 19        physical distance the minor was from the parent or 20        guardian at the time the minor was without 21        supervision; 22            (9) whether the minor's movement was restricted or 23        the minor was otherwise locked within a room or other 24        structure; 25            (10) whether the minor was given a phone number of 26        a person or location to call in the event of an   HB3291- 4 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1        emergency and whether the minor was capable of making 2        an emergency call; 3            (11) whether there was food and other provision 4        left for the minor; 5            (12) whether any of the conduct is attributable to 6        economic hardship or illness and the parent, guardian, 7        or other person having physical custody or control of 8        the child made a good faith effort to provide for the 9        health and safety of the minor; 10            (13) the age and physical and mental capabilities 11        of the person or persons who provided supervision for 12        the minor;13            (14) whether the minor was left under the 14        supervision of another person; 15            (15) any other factor that would endanger the 16        health and safety of that particular minor; or 17        (e) who has been provided with interim crisis 18    intervention services under Section 3-5 of this Act and 19    whose parent, guardian, or custodian refuses to permit the 20    minor to return home unless the minor is an immediate 21    physical danger to the minor or others living in the home. 22    A minor shall not be considered neglected for the sole 23reason that the minor has been relinquished in accordance with 24the Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.25    (1.5) A minor shall not be considered neglected for the 26sole reason that the minor's parent or other person   HB3291- 5 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1responsible for the minor's welfare permits the minor to 2engage in independent activities unless the minor was 3permitted to engage in independent activities under 4circumstances presenting unreasonable risk of harm to the 5minor's mental or physical health, safety, or well-being. 6"Independent activities" includes, but is not limited to:7        (a) traveling to and from school, including by 8    walking, running, or bicycling;9        (b) traveling to and from nearby commercial or 10    recreational facilities;11        (c) engaging in outdoor play;12        (d) remaining in a vehicle unattended, except as 13    otherwise provided by law;14        (e) remaining at home or at a similarly appropriate 15    location unattended; or16        (f) engaging in a similar independent activity alone 17    or with other children.18    In determining whether an independent activity presented 19unreasonable risk of harm, the court shall consider:20        (1) whether the activity is accepted as suitable for 21    minors of the same age, maturity level, and developmental 22    capacity as the involved minor;23        (2) the factors listed in items (1) through (15) of 24    paragraph (d) of subsection (1); and25        (3) any other factor the court deems relevant.26    (2) Those who are abused include any minor under 18 years   HB3291- 6 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1of age or a minor 18 years of age or older for whom the court 2has made a finding of probable cause to believe that the minor 3is abused, neglected, or dependent under subsection (1) of 4Section 2-10 prior to the minor's 18th birthday whose parent 5or immediate family member, or any person responsible for the 6minor's welfare, or any person who is in the same family or 7household as the minor, or any individual residing in the same 8home as the minor, or a paramour of the minor's parent:9        (i) inflicts, causes to be inflicted, or allows to be 10    inflicted upon such minor physical injury, by other than 11    accidental means, which causes death, disfigurement, 12    impairment of physical or emotional health, or loss or 13    impairment of any bodily function;14        (ii) creates a substantial risk of physical injury to 15    such minor by other than accidental means which would be 16    likely to cause death, disfigurement, impairment of 17    emotional health, or loss or impairment of any bodily 18    function;19        (iii) commits or allows to be committed any sex 20    offense against such minor, as such sex offenses are 21    defined in the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 22    of 2012, or in the Wrongs to Children Act, and extending 23    those definitions of sex offenses to include minors under 24    18 years of age;25        (iv) commits or allows to be committed an act or acts 26    of torture upon such minor;  HB3291- 7 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1        (v) inflicts excessive corporal punishment;2        (vi) commits or allows to be committed the offense of 3    involuntary servitude, involuntary sexual servitude of a 4    minor, or trafficking in persons as defined in Section 5    10-9 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 6    2012, upon such minor; or7        (vii) allows, encourages, or requires a minor to 8    commit any act of prostitution, as defined in the Criminal 9    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, and extending 10    those definitions to include minors under 18 years of age; 11    or . 12        (viii) allows, encourages, or requires a minor to 13    engage in panhandling with a person 18 years of age or 14    older. As used in this paragraph, "panhandling" has the 15    meaning ascribed to the term in Section 1 of the Wrongs to 16    Children Act. 17    A minor shall not be considered abused for the sole reason 18that the minor has been relinquished in accordance with the 19Abandoned Newborn Infant Protection Act.20    (3) This Section does not apply to a minor who would be 21included herein solely for the purpose of qualifying for 22financial assistance for the minor or the minor's parents, 23guardian, or custodian.24    (4) The changes made by Public Act 101-79 apply to a case 25that is pending on or after July 12, 2019 (the effective date 26of Public Act 101-79).   HB3291- 8 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-233, eff. 6-30-23; 2103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 3    Section 10. The Wrongs to Children Act is amended by 4changing Sections 1 and 5 as follows: 5    (720 ILCS 150/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2351)6    Sec. 1. Prohibited activities involving children. 7    (a) It shall be unlawful for any person having the care, 8custody or control of any child under the age of fourteen 9years, to exhibit, use or employ, or in any manner, or under 10any pretense, sell, apprentice, give away, let out, or 11otherwise dispose of any such child to any person in or for the 12vocation or occupation, service or purpose of singing, playing 13on musical instruments, rope or wire walking, dancing, 14begging, or peddling, or as a gymnast, contortionist, rider or 15acrobat in any place whatsoever, or for any obscene, indecent 16or immoral purpose, exhibition or practice whatsoever, or for, 17or in any business, exhibition or vocation injurious to the 18health or dangerous to the life or limb of such child, or 19cause, procure or encourage any such child to engage therein. 20Nothing in this section contained shall apply to or affect the 21employment or use of any such child as a singer or musician in 22any church, school or academy (or at any respectable 23entertainment), or the teaching or learning the science or 24practice of music.  HB3291- 9 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1    (b) A person 18 years of age or older who engages in 2panhandling with a person under 18 years of age shall be issued 3a citation by the peace officer who witnesses the violation. 4The officer's local law enforcement agency shall send a 5written or electronic notice to the Department of Children and 6Family Services that the person under 18 years of age is 7endangered by engaging in panhandling with a person 18 years 8years of age or older. 9    (c) In this Section:10    "Citation" means any summons, ticket, or other official 11document issued by a peace officer for a the violation 12containing an order which requires the offender to respond to 13a court to answer the charge.14    "Panhandling" means the selling of food products or other 15items; or begging for money or asking for monetary donations 16unless the child is representing a nonprofit organization.17(Source: Laws 1877, p. 90.) 18    (720 ILCS 150/5)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2355)19    Sec. 5. Any person convicted under the provisions of the 20preceding Sections sections, shall for the first offense be 21guilty of a Class A misdemeanor; and for a second or any 22subsequent offense shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony. Any 23person 18 years of age or older who engages in panhandling with 24a person under 18 years of age is guilty of a Class B 25misdemeanor.   HB3291- 10 -LRB104 10016 RLC 20087 b1(Source: P.A. 77-2346.)